Idaho, session 2025, S1040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 43-320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-320. OFFICERS MUST NOT BE INTERESTED IN CONTRACTS. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, no No director or any other of-
ficer named in this title shall in any manner be interested, directly or in-
directly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the
profits to be derived therefrom; and for any violation of this provision such
officers shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and such conviction shall
work a forfeiture of his office, and he shall be punished by a fine not ex-
ceeding $500, or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6)
months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) A director or any other officer may be interested, directly or indi-
rectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board for the purpose
of recharge, provided that such interested director or officer does not re-
ceive any profits from such contract.
(3) A director or any other officer found to be in violation of the pro-
visions of this section shall:
(a) Be guilty of a misdemeanor;
(b) Forfeit his office; and
(c) Be fined in an amount up to five hundred dollars ($500), imprisoned
in the county jail for up to six (6) months, or both.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.